Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.210.100

Immunization program—Source of immunizations—Written records.

The immunizations required by RCW 28A.210.060 through 28A.210.170 may be obtained from any private or public source desired: PROVIDED, That the immunization is administered and records are made in accordance with the regulations of the state board of health. Any person or organization administering immunizations shall furnish each person immunized, or his or her parent or legal guardian, or any adult in loco parentis to the child, with a written record of immunization given in a form prescribed by the state board of health.

[ 1990 c 33 s 194; 1984 c 40 s 7; 1979 ex.s. c 118 s 6. Formerly RCW 28A.31.110.]

NOTES:

Severability—1984 c 40: See note following RCW 28A.195.050.

Effective date—Severability—1979 ex.s. c 118: See notes following RCW 28A.210.060.